Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 4A Cashing of Payment Instruments

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982, effective July 1, 2014, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of Code Section 7-1-700 through 7-1-707, 7-1-707.1 through 7-1-707.3, 7-1-708 through 7-1-709, relating to cashing checks, drafts, or money orders for consideration, and was based on Ga. L. 1990, p. 739, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 720, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 784, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1780, §§ 4-5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, §§ 29-30; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, §§ 25-27; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1094, §§ 2-3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 27; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, §§ 19-21; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 10; Ga. L. 2003, p. 643, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 8; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 25/SB 70 — 32/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, §§ 15/HB 141 — 17/HB 141; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Money transmission and related financial services, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Department of Banking and Finance Money Transmission, Subject 80-3-1.

7-1-700.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Cash payment instruments” or “cashing payment instruments” means to accept a payment instrument from a person in exchange for monetary value less a fee.

“Check” means any check, money order, draft, or negotiable demand instrument.

“Check casher” means an individual, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in cashing payment instruments for a fee.

“Closed-loop transaction” means a transaction where the value or credit is primarily intended to be redeemed for a limited universe of goods, intangibles, services, or other items provided by the issuer of the payment instrument, its affiliates or agents, or others involved in the transaction functionally related to the issuer or its affiliates or agents.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

“Control,” “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under common control with” means the direct or indirect possession of power to direct or cause the direction of management and policies of a person.

“Covered employee” means any employee of a licensee engaged in any function related to cashing payment instruments.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance.

“Executive officer” means the chief executive officer, president, chief financial officer, chief operating officer, each vice president with responsibility involving policy-making functions for a significant aspect of a person’s business, secretary, treasurer, or any other person performing similar managerial or supervisory functions with respect to any organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated.

“Fee” means a service charge, benefit, or other consideration, which includes, but is not limited to, cash, the exchange of value in excess of regular retail value, mandatory purchase of goods or services by patrons, or the purchase of catalogue items or coupons or other items indicating the ability to receive goods, services, or catalogue items.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Licensee” means a person, including, but not limited to, a check casher, duly licensed under this article to accept payment instruments and exchange them for monetary value for a fee.

“Misrepresent” means to make a false statement of a substantive fact. The term may also mean to engage in any conduct which leads to a false belief which is material to the transaction.

“Monetary value” means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” means a licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of certain persons engaged in nondepository activities.

“Open-loop transaction” means a transaction using a payment instrument with stored value to redeem for goods or services at any location that accepts such payment instrument.

“Payment instrument” means any instrument, order, or device for the payment or transmission of money or monetary value, whether or not it is a negotiable instrument under the terms of Article 3 of Title 11, relating to negotiable instruments. The term includes, but is not limited to, checks, money orders, drafts, stored value cards, and open-loop transactions. The term does not include closed-loop transactions, credit card vouchers, letters of credit, or any instrument that is redeemable by the issuer only in specific goods or services of the issuer.

“Person” means any individual, sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or any other group of individuals, however organized.

“Stored value” means monetary value that is evidenced by an electronic record.

“Ultimate equitable owner” means a person that:

Owns, directly or indirectly, a 10 percent or more interest in a corporation or any other form of business organization;

Owns, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the voting shares of any corporation or any other form of business organization; or

Exerts control, directly or indirectly, over a corporation or any other form of business organization, regardless of whether such person owns or controls such interest through one or more natural persons or one or more proxies, powers of attorney, nominees, corporations, associations, limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, joint stock companies, other entities or devices, or any combination thereof.

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-700

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraphs (15) and (21).

7-1-701.
Licensing for cash payment instruments.

Pursuant to this article, the department may license a person to cash payment instruments.

No person shall cash payment instruments without first obtaining a license under this article.

Every person that directly or indirectly controls another person that violates subsection (b) of this Code section, each general partner, executive officer, joint venture, ultimate equitable owner, or director of such person, and every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions as such person violates with and to the same extent as such person. Any person who directly or indirectly controls a person who violates subsection (b) of this Code section may avoid liability if such person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of the facts by reason of which the original violation is alleged to exist.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-701

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-701.1.
Exemption from licensing requirements.

The requirement for licensure set forth in this article shall not apply to:

Any state or federally chartered bank, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or savings bank with deposits that are federally insured;

The United States Postal Service;

A state or federal governmental department, agency, authority, or instrumentality and its agents;

Any foreign bank that establishes a federal branch pursuant to the International Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 3102;

Any person who accepts a payment instrument from a person in exchange for monetary value but does not charge a fee; or

An individual employed by a licensee or any person exempted from the licensing requirements of this article when acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision of the licensee or exempted person as an employee and not as an independent contractor.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-701.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-702.
Requirements for licensure.

Each applicant for a license under this article shall:

Submit an application in writing, which is made under oath and in such form as the department may prescribe;

Furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry the following information:

The legal name and principal office address of the person applying for the license;

The name, residence, and business address of each director, ultimate equitable owner, and executive officer;

If the applicant has one or more branches or other locations at or through which the applicant proposes to cash payment instruments within this state, the complete address of each such location; and

The location where the initial registered office will be located in this state; and

Submit such other data, financial statements, and pertinent information as the department may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, trustees, officers, members, ultimate equitable owners, or agents.

The application for license shall be filed together with:

An investigation and supervision fee established by rule or regulation which shall not be refundable but which, if the license is granted, shall satisfy the fee requirement for the first licensed year or the remaining part thereof;

Items required by other provisions of this article, including but not limited to Code Section 7-1-703 and subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-707; and

Other information as may be required by the department.

The department shall pay all fees received from licensees and applicants related to applications, licenses, and renewals to the Office of the State Treasurer; provided, however, that the department may net such fees to recover the cost of participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

The department shall enact rules and regulations regarding the time frame by which all persons must submit an original or renewal application for licensure through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-702

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in the introductory language of paragraph (a)(2) and in subsections (c) and (d).

7-1-702.1.
Operation of mobile payment instrument cashing facility.

A mobile payment instrument cashing facility operated by a licensee shall be treated as a branch location and the operations of the facility shall be conducted in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-702.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-702.2.
Authority of department.

The department is authorized to:

Participate in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in order to facilitate the sharing of information and standardization of the licensing and application processes for persons subject to this article;

Enter into operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and other contracts necessary for the department’s participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry;

Disclose or cause to be disclosed without liability, via the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, applicant and licensee information, including, but not limited to, violations of this article and enforcement actions, to facilitate regulatory oversight;

Request that the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry adopt an appropriate privacy, data security, and security breach notification policy that is in full compliance with existing state and federal law; and

Establish and adopt, by rule and regulation, requirements for participation by applicants and licensees in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, upon the department’s determination that each requirement is consistent with both the public interest and purposes of this article.

The department shall enact rules and regulations establishing a process whereby licensees may challenge information entered by the department into the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

Irrespective of its participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, the department shall retain full and exclusive authority over determinations of whether to grant, renew, suspend, or revoke licenses issued under this article. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to reduce or otherwise limit such authority.

Information disclosed through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry is deemed to be disclosed directly to the department and subject to Code Section 7-1-70. Such information shall not be disclosed to the public and shall remain privileged and confidential pursuant to Code Section 7-1-70.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-702.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” throughout this Code section.

7-1-703.
Investigation of applicants; background checks of employees.

The department shall conduct an investigation of every applicant for licensure to determine the financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of such applicant. The department may issue the applicant a license to cash payment instruments if the department determines to its general satisfaction that:

The applicant is financially sound and responsible and able to cash payment instruments in an honest, fair, and efficient manner and with the confidence and trust of the community; and

All conditions for licensure set forth in this article or the rules and regulations of the department have been satisfied.

The department shall not issue a license or may revoke a license if it finds that the applicant or licensee, any person who is a director, officer, partner, agent, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of the applicant or licensee, or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant or licensee has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. For the purposes of this article, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof and regardless of whether first offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was entered or an adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on that charge, unless and until such plea of guilty or such decision, judgment, or verdict shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or until probation, sentence, or both probation and sentence of a first offender have been successfully completed and documented or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon therefor from the President of the United States or the governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred or shall have received an official certification of pardon granted by the state’s pardoning body where the conviction occurred which removes the legal disabilities resulting from such conviction and restores civil and political rights.

The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any applicant or licensee, any person who is a director, officer, partner, agent, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of the applicant or licensee, or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant or licensee. The department may submit directly to the Georgia Crime Information Center two complete sets of fingerprints of such person, together with the required records search fees and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be sent to the department by applicants and licensees together with the fingerprints.

Upon request by the department, each applicant, licensee, any person who is a director, officer, partner, agent, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of the applicant or licensee, or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant or licensee shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprints, the required records search fees, and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be submitted to the department by applicants or licensees together with two complete sets of fingerprints, and the department is authorized to net such fees to recover any costs incurred by the department related to running the background checks. Upon receipt of fingerprints, fees, and other required information, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check, or if there is no such finding. All conviction data received by the department or by the applicant or licensee shall be used by the party requesting such data for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of this article, shall not be a public record, shall be confidential, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect such data. All such records shall be maintained by the department and the applicant or licensee pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as applicable. As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding, verdict, or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

Every applicant and licensee shall be authorized and required to obtain and maintain the results of background checks on covered employees. Such background checks shall be handled by the Georgia Crime Information Center pursuant to Code Section 35-3-34 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Crime Information Center. Applicants and licensees shall be responsible for any applicable fees charged by the Georgia Crime Information Center. An applicant or licensee may only employ a person whose background data has been checked and has been found to be in compliance with all lawful requirements prior to the initial date of hire. This provision does not apply to directors, officers, partners, or ultimate equitable owners of applicants or licensees or to persons who direct the affairs of or control or establish policy for applicants or licensees, whose background shall have been investigated through the department before taking office, beginning employment, or securing ownership. Upon receipt of information from the Georgia Crime Information Center that is incomplete or that indicates a covered employee has a criminal record in any state other than Georgia, the employer shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprint cards for such person, together with the applicable fees and any other required information. The department shall submit such fingerprints as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

Applicants and licensees shall have the primary responsibility for obtaining background checks on covered employees. The department shall be entitled to review the files of any applicant or licensee to determine whether the required background checks have been run and whether all covered employees are qualified. The department shall be authorized to discuss the status of employee background checks with applicants and licensees. Notwithstanding any other provisions in this article, the department shall retain the right to obtain conviction data on covered employees of applicants and licensees.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-703

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 29/HB 184; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “As used in this Code section, the term ‘conviction data’ ” for “As used in this Code section, ‘conviction data’ ” at the beginning of the last sentence of subsection (d).

7-1-703.1.
Reporting on condition to Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

Each licensee shall submit to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry timely reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the department and the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-703.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” throughout this Code section.

7-1-703.2.
Use of unique identifier of licensee.

The unique identifier of any licensee shall be clearly labeled on all advertisements and any other documents required by rule or regulation of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-703.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-704.
Renewal of licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this article, all licenses issued pursuant to this article shall expire on December 31 of each year, and each application for renewal shall be made annually on or before December 1 of each year. A license may be renewed by the filing of an application substantially conforming to the requirements of Code Section 7-1-702 and the department’s rules and regulations. No investigation fee shall be payable in connection with such renewal application. However, an annual license fee established by rule or regulation of the department to defray the cost of supervision shall be paid with each renewal application and shall not be refunded or prorated.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-704

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-704.1.
Posting of license; license is nontransferable and nonassignable; notification of new facilities.

A license issued pursuant to this article shall be kept conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee.

Such license shall not be transferable or assignable.

No licensee shall cash payment instruments under any name or names other than those authorized by the department in writing.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department prior to the operation of any new or additional locations not reported in either its original or renewal application which notice shall be in such form and contain such information as required by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-704.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 30/HB 184.

7-1-705.
Written notice of claims against licensee, judgments, or other misconduct by employees, directors, or others; written notice of change of executive officer.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department of any action which may be brought against it by any creditor or claimant where such action relates to activities authorized under this article or involves a claim against the bond filed with the department under subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-707. The notice shall provide details sufficient to identify the action and shall be sent within 30 days after the commencement of any such action. The licensee shall also give written notice to the department within 30 days of the entry of any judgment against the licensee.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department within ten days of the following:

Any knowledge or discovery of an act prohibited by Code Section 7-1-703 or 7-1-707 or subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-708;

The discharge of any employee for actual or suspected misrepresentations, dishonest acts, or fraudulent acts; or

Any knowledge or discovery of an administrative, civil, or criminal action initiated by any government entity against the licensee or any of the licensee’s directors, officers, partners, ultimate equitable owners, or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the licensee.

Unless prior approval of a change in executive officer is required under Code Section 7-1-705.1 and notwithstanding subsection (e) of Code Section 7-1-703 requiring a criminal background check prior to the initial date of hire, a licensee shall notify the department in writing of any change of executive officer in such a manner that the notice is received by the department no later than ten business days after the effective date of the change. In the event of such change, the licensee shall initiate a criminal background check no later than ten business days after the effective date of the change.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-705

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 21/HB 780; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 34/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, added subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “by registered or certified mail” following “to the department” in the first and third sentences of subsection (a) and in the introductory language of subsection (b); inserted “written” in the last sentence in subsection (a); and substituted “against the licensee or any” for “against the licensee, any” in paragraph (b)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-705.1.
Approval required for change of control or ultimate equitable owner; additional requirements; denial and notification of reasons.

Except as provided in this Code section, no person shall become an ultimate equitable owner of any licensee through acquisition or other change in control or become an executive officer of a licensee as a result of such acquisition or other change in control unless the person has first received written approval for such acquisition, change in control, or designation as an executive officer from the department. In order to obtain such approval, such person shall:

File an application with the department in such form as the department may prescribe from time to time;

Provide such other information as the department may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors and executive officers, if a corporation, and its members, if applicable, and of any proposed new directors, executive officers, members, or ultimate equitable owners of the licensee; and

Pay such application fee as the department may prescribe.

The department may prescribe additional requirements for approval of such acquisition, change in control, or designation as an executive officer as a result of such acquisition or other change in control through rules and regulations.

If the application is denied, the department shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-705.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 22/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “as a result of such acquisition or other change in control” in the middle of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a) and in subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”